Texas statutes.
ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE CODE

TITLE 3. LICENSES AND PERMITS

SUBTITLE A. PERMITS

CHAPTER 19. WHOLESALER'S PERMIT

Sec. 19.01. AUTHORIZED ACTIVITIES. The holder of a wholesaler's permit may:

(1) purchase and import liquor from distillers, wineries, and rectifiers who are holders of nonresident seller's permits or from their agents;

(2) purchase liquor from other wholesalers in the state;

(3) sell liquor in the original containers in which it is received to retailers and wholesalers in this state authorized to sell the liquor; and

(4) sell liquor to qualified persons outside the state.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 417, ch. 194, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 3 (S.B. 731), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1359 (H.B. 1545), Sec. 72(a), eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1359 (H.B. 1545), Sec. 72(b), eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 19.03. PROMOTIONAL ACTIVITIES. The holder of a wholesaler's permit or the permittee's agent may enter the licensed premises of a mixed beverage permittee or private club registration permittee to determine the brands offered for sale and suggest or promote the sale of other brands, to the extent authorized by Section 102.07. The holder of a wholesaler's permit or the permittee's agent may not accept a direct order from a mixed beverage permittee except for wine.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 418, ch. 194, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1359 (H.B. 1545), Sec. 73, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 19.04. MINIATURE CONTAINERS. In addition to other authorized containers, a wholesaler's permittee may import, sell, offer for sale, and possess for the purpose of resale distilled spirits, wine, and vinous liquors in containers of not less than one ounce nor more than two ounces. Liquor in containers of that size may be sold to:

(1) package store permittees for resale to certain passenger transportation permittees, as provided in Section 48.03; and

(2) local distributor's permittees.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 418, ch. 194, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1359 (H.B. 1545), Sec. 74, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 19.06. TRANSPORTING LIQUOR. (a) The holder of a wholesaler's permit may transport liquor, if the transportation is for a lawful purpose, from:

(1) the place of purchase to the holder's place of business; and

(2) the place of sale or distribution to the purchaser.

(b) The holder of a wholesaler's permit may transport liquor from one wet area to another wet area across a dry area if that course of transportation is necessary or convenient.

(c) The holder of a wholesaler's permit transporting liquor under this section shall provide to the commission:

(1) a full description of each motor vehicle used by the permit holder for transporting liquor; and

(2) any other information the commission requires.

(d) The holder of a wholesaler's permit may transport liquor only in a vehicle that is:

(1) described by Subsection (c)(1);

(2) owned or leased in good faith by the permit holder or by the permit holder's agent; and

(3) printed or painted with the designation required by the commission.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1359 (H.B. 1545), Sec. 75, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 19.07. STORAGE. (a) The holder of a wholesaler's permit may store liquor:

(1) on the permit holder's premises; or

(2) inside the county in which the permit holder's business is located in a:

(A) public bonded warehouse authorized to store liquor under Chapter 46; or

(B) private warehouse that is:

(i) owned or leased by the permit holder; and

(ii) operated by the permit holder.

(b) The holder of a wholesaler's permit may not store liquor in a dry area.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1359 (H.B. 1545), Sec. 76, eff. September 1, 2021.